Hawaii statutes.
§425-5 Minors and incompetent persons.
A minor or incompetent person may not be a partner, but may have a beneficial
interest in a partnership through a trustee or duly appointed guardian.

This section shall not apply to the current
partners in any duly registered partnership doing business in the State as of
July 14, 1969. [L 1969, c 247, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §68]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next